Illinois, session 104th, SB1277.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Power Agency Act is amended by 5adding Section 1-56.5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3855/1-56.5 new)7    Sec. 1-56.5. Surety bonds required for solar installers to 8ensure payment of warranty and rebate obligations. 9    (a) Beginning one year after the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, a company that 11provides solar project installation services or solar facility 12installation services shall not install a solar project or 13solar facility in this State unless that company has posted 14and maintained, with the Agency, a surety bond in the amount of 15$2,000,000 or such higher amount as is annually set by the 16Agency by rule under subsection (b), for the purpose of 17ensuring, regardless of whether the company closes, files for 18bankruptcy protection, or reorganizes, that:19        (1) all of the company's warranty obligations to 20    customers in the State are met; and 21        (2) all of the rebate payments owed by the company to 22    customers in the State are paid. 23    (b) Within 6 months after the effective date of this   SB1277- 2 -LRB104 06361 AAS 16397 b1amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Agency shall 2adopt rules establishing requirements for the surety bonds 3described in this Section and the procedures for posting and 4maintaining those surety bonds with the Agency. The rules 5adopted under this subsection (b) shall prescribe the type and 6amount of the surety bond required under this Section and the 7conditions under which the Agency is entitled to collect 8moneys from such bonds. The rules adopted under this 9subsection (b) may also contain any other provisions the 10Agency deems necessary to administer this Section. Beginning 2 11years after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 12104th General Assembly, the Agency shall, by rule, annually 13adjust the amount of the surety bond required under this 14Section. 15    (c) There is hereby created within the State treasury a 16special fund to be known as the Solar Installation Fund. Any 17moneys forfeited to the State from any surety bond required 18under this Section shall be deposited into the Solar 19Installation Fund and shall, upon approval by the Governor and 20the Director, be used by and under the direction of the Agency 21for the purposes for which such surety bond was issued. The 22Solar Installation Fund is not subject to the provisions of 23subsection (c) of Section 5 of the State Finance Act. 24    (d) The Agency may enter into any contract or agreement 25that it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this 26Section. Neither the State, nor the Director, nor any State   SB1277- 3 -LRB104 06361 AAS 16397 b1employee shall be liable for any damages or injuries arising 2out of or resulting from any action taken under this Section. 3    (e) The Agency may approve or disapprove any surety bond 4required under this Section. Any person whose surety bond is 5disapproved by the Agency may contest the disapproval under 6the Administrative Review Law. 7    (f) Nothing in this Section shall bar a cause of action by 8the State for any other penalty or relief provided by this Act 9or any other law.  10    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 11Section 5.1030 as follows: 12    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)13    Sec. 5.1030. The Solar Installation Fund.